California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(I) If the review hearing is the last review hearing to be held before the child attains 18 years of age, the court shall conduct the hearing
 pursuant to Section 366.31 or 366.32.

(2) The court shall project a likely date by which the child may be returned to and safely maintained in the home or placed for adoption, tribal customary adoption in the case of an Indian child, legal guardianship, placed with a fit and willing relative, or in another planned permanent living arrangement.

(b) Subsequent to the hearing, periodic reviews of each child in foster care shall be conducted pursuant to the requirements of Sections 366.3 and 16503.

(c) If the child has been placed out of state, each review described in subdivision (a) and any reviews conducted pursuant to Sections 366.3 and 16503 shall also address whether the out-of-state placement continues to be the
 most appropriate placement selection and in the best interests of the child.

(d) (1) A review described in subdivision (a) and any reviews conducted pursuant to Sections 366.3 and 16503 shall not result in a placement of a child outside the United States prior to a judicial finding that the placement is in the best interest of the child, except as required by federal law or treaty.

(2) The party or agency requesting placement of the child outside the United States shall carry the burden of proof and must show, by clear and convincing evidence, that a placement outside the United States is in the best interest of the child.

(3) In determining the best interest of the child, the court shall consider, but not
 be limited to, the following factors:

(A) Placement with a relative.

(B) Placement of siblings in the same home.

(C) Amount and nature of any contact between the child and the potential guardian or caretaker.

(D) Physical and medical needs of the dependent child.

(E) Psychological and emotional needs of the dependent child.

(F) Social, cultural, and educational needs of the dependent child.

(G) Specific desires of any dependent child who is 12 years of age or older.

(4) If the court finds that a placement outside the United States is, by clear and convincing evidence, in the best interest of the child, the court may issue an order authorizing the social worker or placing agency to make a placement outside the United States. A child subject to this subdivision shall not leave the United States prior to the issuance of the order described in this paragraph.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “outside the United States” shall not include the lands of any federally recognized American Indian tribe or Alaskan Natives.

(6) This section shall not apply to the placement of a dependent child with a parent.

(e) (1) On and after July 1, 2021, a child shall not be placed or remain in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, unless the placement is ordered or approved pursuant to Section 361.21.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after July 1, 2022, a child shall not be placed by a county child welfare agency in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, except for placements described in subdivision (h) of Section 7911.1 of the Family Code.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a child who is placed in an out-of-state residential facility by a county child welfare agency shall not remain in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined in subdivision (b)
 of Section 7910 of the Family Code, after January 1, 2023.

(f) The status review of every nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, shall be conducted pursuant to the requirements of Sections 366.3, 366.31, or 366.32, and 16503
 until dependency jurisdiction is terminated pursuant to Section 391.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 845, Sec. 2.   (AB 2929)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

366.05.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 366.21, in a county of the first class, any supplemental report filed in connection with a status review hearing held pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 366 shall be provided to the parent or legal guardian and to counsel for the child at least 10 calendar days before the hearing. This may be accomplished by electronically serving the report pursuant to Section 212.5 or by mailing the report at least 15 calendar days before the hearing to a party whose address is within the State of California, or at least 20 calendar days before the hearing to a party whose address is outside the State of California. The court shall grant a reasonable continuance, not to exceed 10 calendar days,
 upon request by any party or his or her counsel on the ground that the report was not provided at least 10 calendar days before the hearing as required by this section, unless the party or his or her counsel has expressly waived the requirement that the report be provided within the 10-day period or the court finds that the party’s ability to proceed at the hearing is not prejudiced by the lack of timely service of the report. In making this determination, the court shall presume that a party is prejudiced by the lack of timely service of the report, and may find that the party is not prejudiced only by clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 132.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

366.1.

Each supplemental report required to be filed pursuant to Section 366 shall include, but not be limited to, a factual discussion of each of the following subjects:

(a) Whether the county welfare department social worker has considered either of the following:

(1) Child protective services, as defined in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 4 of Division 9, as a possible solution to the problems at hand, and has offered those services to qualified parents, if appropriate under the circumstances.

(2) Whether the child can be returned to the custody of the child’s parent
 who is enrolled in a certified substance abuse treatment facility that allows a dependent child to reside with the child’s parent.

(b) What plan, if any, for the return and maintenance of the child in a safe home is recommended to the court by the county welfare department social worker.

(c) Whether the subject child appears to be a person who is eligible to be considered for further court action to free the child from parental custody and control.

(d) What actions, if any, have been taken by the parent to correct the problems that caused the child to be made a dependent child of the court.

(e) If the parent or guardian is unwilling or unable to
 participate in making an educational decision for their child, or if other circumstances exist that compromise the ability of the parent or guardian to make educational decisions for the child, the county welfare department or social worker shall consider whether the right of the parent or guardian to make educational decisions for the child should be limited. If the supplemental report makes that recommendation, the report shall identify whether there is a responsible adult available to make educational decisions for the child pursuant to Section 361.

(f) (1) The health and education of the minor, including a copy of the complete health and education summary, as required under Section 16010, including the name and contact information of the person or persons currently holding the right to make educational decisions for
 the child.

(2) In instances in which it is determined that disclosure pursuant to paragraph (1) of the contact information of the person or persons currently holding the right to make educational decisions for the child poses a threat to the health and safety of that individual or those individuals, that contact information shall be redacted or withheld from the health and education summary within the supplemental report described in this section.

(g) For a child or nonminor dependent who does not reside with their relatives, nonrelative extended family members, or in the case of an Indian child, their extended family members as defined in
 Section 224.1, or an Indian custodian, the continued efforts, and in the case of an Indian child, the active efforts, as defined by subdivision (f) of Section 224.1, that the social worker has made to locate any relatives, extended family members, or nonrelative extended family members who could provide family support or possible placement of the child or nonminor dependent and the names of those relatives, extended family members, or nonrelative extended family members. The social worker shall document the efforts and the
 results of those efforts.

(h) (1) Whether the child has any siblings under the court’s jurisdiction, and, if any siblings exist, all of the following:

(A) The nature of the relationship between the child and the child’s siblings.

(B) The appropriateness of developing or maintaining the sibling relationships pursuant to Section 16002.

(C) If the siblings are not placed together in the same home, why the siblings are not placed together and what efforts are being made to place the siblings together, or why those efforts are not appropriate.

(D) If the siblings are not placed
 together, all of the following:

(i) The frequency and nature of the visits between the siblings.

(ii) If there are visits between the siblings, whether the visits are supervised or unsupervised. If the visits are supervised, a discussion of the reasons why the visits are supervised, and what needs to be accomplished in order for the visits to be unsupervised.

(iii) If there are visits between the siblings, a description of the location and length of the visits.

(iv) Any plan to increase visitation between the siblings.

(E) The impact of the sibling relationships on the child’s placement and planning for legal
 permanence.

(2) The factual discussion shall include a discussion of indicators of the nature of the child’s sibling relationships, including, but not limited to, whether the siblings were raised together in the same home, whether the siblings have shared significant common experiences or have existing close and strong bonds, whether either sibling expresses a desire to visit or live with their sibling, as applicable, and whether ongoing contact is in the child’s best emotional interests.

(i) (1) For a child who is 10 years of age or older and has been under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for a year or longer, or a nonminor dependent, either of the following:

(A) For a child in junior high or
 middle school, either that the child has already received comprehensive sexual health education that meets the requirements of Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 51930) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code through the school system while in junior high or middle school or how the county will ensure that the child receives that instruction at least once before completing junior high or middle school if the child remains under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court during that timeframe.

(B) For a child in high school or a nonminor dependent, either that the child has received comprehensive sexual health education that meets the requirements of Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 51930) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code through the school system while in high school, or how the county will
 ensure that the child or nonminor dependent receives that instruction at least once before completing high school if the child remains under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court during that timeframe.

(2) For a child who is 10 years of age or older or a nonminor dependent, whether the social worker or probation officer has done all of the following:

(A) Informed the child or nonminor dependent that they may access age-appropriate, medically accurate information about reproductive and sexual health care, including, but not limited to, unplanned pregnancy prevention, abstinence, use of birth control, abortion, and the prevention and treatment of sexually transmitted infections.

(B) Informed the child or nonminor
 dependent, in an age and developmentally appropriate manner, of the child’s right to consent to sexual and reproductive health services and the child’s confidentiality rights regarding those services.

(C) Informed the child or nonminor dependent how to access reproductive and sexual health care services and facilitated access to that care, including by assisting with any identified barriers to care, as needed.

(3) This subdivision does not affect any applicable confidentiality law.

(4) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this subdivision.

(j) (1) For a child who is 16 years of age or older or for a nonminor dependent, whether the social worker or probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education.

(2) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this subdivision.

(k) Whether a child who is 10 years of age or older and
 who has been in an out-of-home placement for six months or longer has relationships with individuals other than the child’s siblings who are important to the child, consistent with the child’s best interests, and actions taken to maintain those relationships. The social worker shall ask every child who is 10 years of age or older and who has been in an out-of-home placement for six months or longer to identify any individuals other than the child’s siblings who are important to the child, consistent with the child’s best interest. The social worker may ask any other child to provide that information, as appropriate.

(l) The implementation and operation of the amendments to subdivision (j) enacted at the 2005–06 Regular Session shall be subject to appropriation through the budget process and by phase, as provided in Section
 366.35.

(m) On and after October 1, 2021, for a child whose placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program has been reviewed and approved, and, on and after July 1, 2022, for a child whose placement in a community treatment facility has been reviewed and approved, pursuant to Section 361.22, the supplemental report shall include evidence of all of the following:

(1) Ongoing assessment of the strengths and needs of the child that continues to support the determination that the needs of the child cannot be met by family members or in another family-based setting, placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program or community treatment facility, as applicable, continues to provide the most effective and appropriate care setting in the least restrictive
 environment, and placement is consistent with the short- and long-term mental and behavioral health goals and permanency plan for the child.

(2) Documentation of the child’s specific treatment or service needs that will be met in the placement and the length of time the child is expected to need the treatment or services. For a Medi-Cal beneficiary, the determination of services and expected length of time for those services funded by Medi-Cal shall be based upon medical necessity and on all other state and federal Medi-Cal requirements, and shall be reflected in the documentation.

(3) Documentation of the intensive and ongoing efforts made by the child welfare department, consistent with the child’s permanency plan, to prepare the child to return home or to be placed with a fit
 and willing relative, a legal guardian, an adoptive parent, in a resource family home or tribally approved home, or in another appropriate family-based setting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 845, Sec. 3.   (AB 2929)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

366.2.

The court report prepared pursuant to Section 366.1 shall include a copy of each child and family team action plan, as required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501, that is completed on or after January 1, 2026, and was not previously provided to the court.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 5.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

366.21.

(a) Every hearing conducted by the juvenile court reviewing the status of a dependent child shall be placed on the appearance calendar. The court shall advise all persons present at the hearing of the date of the future hearing and of their right to be present and represented by counsel.

(b) Except as provided in Sections 294 and 295, notice of the hearing shall be provided pursuant to Section 293.

(c) At least 10 calendar days before the hearing, the social worker shall file a supplemental report with the court regarding the services provided or offered to the parent or legal guardian to enable them to assume custody and the
 efforts made to achieve legal permanence for the child if efforts to reunify fail, including, but not limited to, efforts to maintain relationships between a child who is 10 years of age or older and has been in out-of-home placement for six months or longer and individuals who are important to the child, consistent with the child’s best interests; the progress made; and, where relevant, the prognosis for return of the child to the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian; and shall make their recommendation for disposition. If the child is a member of a sibling group described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.5, the report and recommendation may also take into account those factors described in subdivision (e) relating to the child’s sibling group. If the recommendation is not to return the child to a parent or legal guardian, the report shall
 specify why the return of the child would be detrimental to the child. The social worker shall provide the parent or legal guardian, counsel for the child, and any court-appointed child advocate with a copy of the report, including their recommendation for disposition, at least 10 calendar days before the hearing. The report may be served pursuant to Section 212.5. In the case of a child removed from the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian, the social worker shall, at least 10 calendar days before the hearing, provide a summary of their recommendation for disposition to any foster parents, relative caregivers, and certified foster parents who have been approved for adoption by the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency or by a county adoption agency, community care facility, or foster family agency having the physical custody of the child. The
 social worker shall include a copy of the Judicial Council’s Caregiver Information Form (JV-290) with the summary of their recommendation to the child’s foster parents, relative caregivers, or foster parents approved for adoption, in the caregiver’s primary language when available, along with information on how to file the form with the court. The form and summary of the recommendation may be served electronically pursuant to Section 212.5.

(d) Prior to any hearing involving a child in the physical custody of a community care facility or a foster family agency that may result in the return of the child to the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian, or in adoption or the creation of a legal guardianship, or in the case of an Indian child, in consultation with the child’s tribe, tribal customary adoption, the facility or agency shall
 file with the court a report, or a Judicial Council’s Caregiver Information Form (JV-290), containing its recommendation for disposition. Prior to the hearing involving a child in the physical custody of a foster parent, a relative caregiver, or a certified foster parent who has been approved for adoption by the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency or by a county adoption agency, the foster parent, relative caregiver, or the certified foster parent who has been approved for adoption by the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency or by a county adoption agency, may file with the court a report containing their recommendation for disposition. The court shall consider the report and recommendation filed pursuant to this subdivision prior to determining any disposition.

(e) (1) At the review hearing held 6 months after the initial dispositional hearing, but no later than 12 months after the date the child entered foster care as determined in Section 361.49, whichever occurs earlier, after considering the admissible and relevant evidence, the court shall order the return of the child to the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian unless the court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the return of the child to their parent or legal guardian would create a substantial risk of detriment to the safety, protection, or physical or emotional well-being of the child. The social worker shall have the burden of establishing that detriment. At the hearing, the court shall consider the criminal history, obtained pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 16504.5, of the parent or legal guardian subsequent to the
 child’s removal to the extent that the criminal record is substantially related to the welfare of the child or the parent’s or guardian’s ability to exercise custody and control regarding their child, provided the parent or legal guardian agreed to submit fingerprint images to obtain criminal history information as part of the case plan. The court shall also consider whether the child can be returned to the custody of their parent who is enrolled in a certified substance abuse treatment facility that allows a dependent child to reside with their parent. The fact that the parent is enrolled in a certified substance abuse treatment facility shall not be, for that reason alone, prima facie evidence of detriment. In making its determination, the court shall review and consider the social worker’s report and recommendations and the report and recommendations of any child advocate appointed pursuant to
 Section 356.5; and shall consider the efforts or progress, or both, demonstrated by the parent or legal guardian and the extent to which they availed themselves of services provided, taking into account the particular barriers to a minor parent or a nonminor dependent parent, or an incarcerated, institutionalized, detained, or deported parent’s or legal guardian’s access to those court-mandated services and ability to maintain contact with their child.

(2) Regardless of whether the child is returned to a parent or legal guardian, the court shall specify the factual basis for its conclusion that the return would be detrimental or would not be detrimental. The court also shall make appropriate findings pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 366; and, when relevant, shall order any additional services reasonably believed to facilitate the
 return of the child to the custody of their parent or legal guardian. The court shall also inform the parent or legal guardian that if the child cannot be returned home by the 12-month permanency hearing, a proceeding pursuant to Section 366.26 may be instituted. This section does not apply in a case in which, pursuant to Section 361.5, the court has ordered that reunification services shall not be provided.

(3) If the child was under three years of age on the date of the initial removal, or is a member of a sibling group described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.5, and the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the parent failed to participate regularly and make substantive progress in a court-ordered treatment plan, the court may schedule a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 within 120 days.
 If, however, the court finds there is a substantial probability that the child, who was under three years of age on the date of initial removal or is a member of a sibling group described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.5, may be returned to their parent or legal guardian within 6 months or that reasonable services have not been provided, or, in the case of an Indian child, active efforts as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 224.1 have not been made, the court shall continue the case to the 12-month permanency hearing.

(4) For
 the purpose of placing and maintaining a sibling group together in a permanent home, the court, in making its determination to schedule a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 for some or all members of a sibling group, as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.5, shall review and consider the social worker’s report and recommendations. Factors the report shall address, and the court shall consider, may include, but need not be limited to, whether the sibling group was removed from parental care as a group, the closeness and strength of the sibling bond, the ages of the siblings, the appropriateness of maintaining the sibling group together, the detriment to the child if sibling ties are not maintained, the likelihood of finding a permanent home for the sibling group, whether the sibling group is currently placed together in a preadoptive home or has a
 concurrent plan goal of legal permanency in the same home, the wishes of each child whose age and physical and emotional condition permits a meaningful response, and the best interests of each child in the sibling group. The court shall specify the factual basis for its finding that it is in the best interests of each child to schedule a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 within 120 days for some or all of the members of the sibling group.

(5) If the child was removed initially under subdivision (g) of Section 300 and the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the whereabouts of the parent are still unknown, or the parent has failed to contact and visit the child, the court may schedule a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 within 120 days. The court shall take into account any particular barriers to a parent’s ability to
 maintain contact with their child due to the parent’s incarceration, institutionalization, detention by the United States Department of Homeland Security, or deportation. If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the parent has been convicted of a felony indicating parental unfitness, the court may schedule a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 within 120 days.

(6) If the child had been placed under court supervision with a previously noncustodial parent pursuant to Section 361.2, the court shall determine whether supervision is still necessary. The court may terminate supervision and transfer permanent custody to that parent, as provided for by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 361.2.

(7) In all other cases, the court shall direct that any reunification services
 previously ordered shall continue to be offered to the parent or legal guardian pursuant to the time periods set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 361.5, provided that the court may modify the terms and conditions of those services.

(8) If the child is not returned to their parent or legal guardian, the court shall determine by clear and convincing evidence whether reasonable services that were designed to aid the parent or legal guardian in overcoming the problems that led to the initial removal and the continued custody of the child have been provided or offered to the parent or legal guardian, and, in the case of an Indian child, whether the agency has made active efforts, as defined in Section 224.1, to provide remedial services and rehabilitative programs designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family. The court shall order that
 those services be initiated, continued, or terminated.

(f) (1) The permanency hearing shall be held no later than 12 months after the date the child entered foster care, as that date is determined pursuant to Section 361.49. At the permanency hearing, the court shall determine the permanent plan for the child, which shall include a determination of whether the child will be returned to the child’s home and, if so, when, within the time limits of subdivision (a) of Section 361.5. After considering the relevant and admissible evidence, the court shall order the return of the child to the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian unless the court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the return of the child to their parent or legal guardian would create a substantial risk of detriment to the safety,
 protection, or physical or emotional well-being of the child. The social worker shall have the burden of establishing that detriment.

(A) At the permanency hearing, the court shall consider the criminal history, obtained pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 16504.5, of the parent or legal guardian subsequent to the child’s removal to the extent that the criminal record is substantially related to the welfare of the child or the parent’s or
 legal guardian’s ability to exercise custody and control regarding their child, provided that the parent or legal guardian agreed to submit fingerprint images to obtain criminal history information as part of the case plan. The court shall also determine by clear and convincing evidence whether reasonable services that were designed to aid the parent or legal guardian to overcome the problems that led to the initial removal and continued custody of the child have been provided or offered to the parent or legal
 guardian, and, in the case of an Indian child, whether the agency has made active efforts, as defined in Section 224.1, to provide remedial services and rehabilitative programs designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family.

(B) The court shall also consider whether the child can be returned to the custody of their parent who is enrolled in a certified substance abuse treatment facility that allows a dependent child to reside with their parent. The fact that the parent is enrolled in a certified substance abuse treatment facility shall not be, for that reason alone, prima facie evidence of detriment.

(C) In making its determination, the court shall review and consider the social worker’s report and recommendations and the report and recommendations of any child
 advocate appointed pursuant to Section 356.5, shall consider the efforts or progress, or both, demonstrated by the parent or legal guardian and the extent to which they availed themselves of services provided, taking into account the particular barriers to a minor parent or a nonminor dependent parent, or an incarcerated, institutionalized, detained, or deported parent’s or legal guardian’s access to those court-mandated services and ability to maintain contact with their child, and shall make appropriate findings pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 366.

(D) For each youth 16 years of age and older, the court shall also determine whether services have been made available to assist them in making the transition from foster care to successful adulthood.

(2) Regardless of whether the child is returned to their parent or legal guardian, the court shall specify the factual basis for its decision. If the child is not returned to a parent or legal guardian,
 the court shall specify the factual basis for its conclusion that the return would be detrimental. The court also shall make a finding pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 366. If the child is not returned to their parent or legal guardian, the court shall consider, and state for the record, in-state and out-of-state placement options. If the child is placed out of the state, the court shall make a determination whether the out-of-state placement continues to be appropriate and in the best interests of the child.

(g) If the time period in which the court-ordered services were provided has met or exceeded the time period set forth in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.5, as appropriate, and a child is not returned to the custody of a parent or legal guardian at the permanency hearing held
 pursuant to subdivision (f), the court shall do one of the following:

(1) Continue the case for up to 6 months for a permanency review hearing, provided that the hearing shall occur within 18 months of the date the child was originally taken from the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian. The court shall continue the case only if it finds that there is a substantial probability that the child will be returned to the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian and safely maintained in the home within the extended period of time or that reasonable services have not been provided to the parent or legal guardian, or in the case of an Indian child,
 that active efforts as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 224.1 have not been made by the agency. For purposes of this section, in order to find a substantial probability that the child will be returned to the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian and safely maintained in the home within the extended period of time, the court shall be required to find all of the following:

(A) That the parent or legal guardian has consistently and regularly contacted and visited with the child.

(B) That the parent or legal guardian has made significant progress in resolving problems that led to the child’s removal from the home.

(C) The parent or legal guardian has demonstrated the capacity and ability both to
 complete the objectives of their treatment plan and to provide for the child’s safety, protection, physical and emotional well-being, and special needs.

(i) For purposes of this subdivision, the court’s decision to continue the case based on a finding or substantial probability that the child will be returned to the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian is a compelling reason for determining that a hearing held pursuant to Section 366.26 is not in the best interests of the child.

(ii) The court shall inform the parent or legal guardian that if the child cannot be returned home by the next permanency review hearing, a proceeding pursuant to Section 366.26 may be instituted. The court shall not order that a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 be held unless there is clear and
 convincing evidence that reasonable services have been provided or offered to the parent or legal guardian, or, in the case of an Indian child, that the agency has made active efforts, as defined in Section 224.1, to provide remedial services and rehabilitative programs designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family.

(2) Continue the case for up to 6 months for a permanency review hearing, provided that the hearing shall occur within 18 months of the date the child was originally taken from the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian, if the parent has been arrested and issued an immigration hold, detained by the United States Department of Homeland
 Security, or deported to their country of origin, and the court determines either that there is a substantial probability that the child will be returned to the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian and safely maintained in the home within the extended period of time or that reasonable services have not been provided to the parent or legal
 guardian, or, in the case of an Indian child, that active efforts, as defined in Section 224.1, have not been made.

(3) For purposes of paragraph (2), in order to find a substantial probability that the child will be returned to the physical custody of their parent or legal guardian and safely maintained in the home within the extended period of time, the court shall find all of the following:

(A) The parent or legal guardian has consistently and regularly contacted and visited with the child, taking into account any particular barriers to a parent’s ability to maintain contact with their child due to the parent’s arrest and receipt of an immigration hold, detention
 by the United States Department of Homeland Security, or deportation.

(B) The parent or legal guardian has made significant progress in resolving the problems that led to the child’s removal from the home.

(C) The parent or legal guardian has demonstrated the capacity or ability both to complete the objectives of their treatment plan and to provide for the child’s safety, protection, physical and emotional well-being, and special needs.

(4) Order that a hearing be held within 120 days, pursuant to Section 366.26, but only if the court does not continue the case to the permanency planning review hearing and there is clear and convincing evidence that reasonable services have been provided or offered to the parents or
 legal guardians, or in the case of an Indian child, that the agency has made active efforts, as defined in Section 224.1, to provide remedial services and rehabilitative programs designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family. On and after January 1, 2012, a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 shall not be ordered if the child is a nonminor dependent, unless the nonminor dependent is an Indian child and tribal customary adoption is recommended as the permanent plan.

(5) Order that the child remain in foster care, but only if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence, based upon the evidence already presented to it, including a recommendation by the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency or by a county adoption agency, that there is a compelling reason for determining that a hearing held
 pursuant to Section 366.26 is not in the best interests of the child because the child is not a proper subject for adoption and has no one willing to accept legal guardianship as of the hearing date. For purposes of this section, a recommendation by the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency or by a county adoption agency that adoption is not in the best interests of the child shall constitute a compelling reason for the court’s determination. That recommendation shall be based on the present circumstances of the child and shall not preclude a different recommendation at a later date if the child’s circumstances change. On and after January 1, 2012, the nonminor dependent’s legal status as an adult is in and of itself a compelling reason not to hold a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26. The court may order that a nonminor dependent who otherwise is eligible
 pursuant to Section 11403 remain in a planned, permanent living arrangement.
